Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 9 Recycling
8-9-403. Operation of waste tire sites — Requirements and prohibited activities.

The owner or operator of any waste tire site shall provide the Division of Environmental Quality and the applicable regional solid waste management district with:

Information concerning the waste tire site's location and size and the approximate number of tires that are accumulated at the waste tire site; and

A written plan specifying a method and time schedule, subject to approval by the division, for the removal, disposal, or recycling of the tires.

The owner or operator shall implement a written plan approved by the division according to the written plan's schedule.

A person shall not cause or permit the open burning of tires in the state.

A person shall not maintain a waste tire site.

It is illegal for any person to dispose of tires or portions of tires in the state unless the tires or portions of tires are disposed of for processing or collected for processing at a permitted tire processing facility, a tire collection center, or a permitted solid waste disposal facility.

Unless otherwise provided by law or rule, whole tires shall not be deposited into a landfill or a waste tire monofill as a method of final disposal unless shredded or split into sufficiently small parts to assure their proper disposal.

Unless otherwise provided by law or rule, only small tires that have been processed by cutting, shredding, or splitting into sufficiently small parts to assure proper disposal or small tires processed by baling may be disposed of at a disposal site that has a permit issued for a landfill designed and operated as a waste tire monofill.

Suitable processed-tire materials may be used in the construction of daily and intermediate cover systems for all landfills if the use is:

Authorized by the division;

Shown to not present a threat to human health and the environment; and

Shown to control disease, vectors, fires, odors, blowing litter, or scavenging.

A person who leases, owns, or otherwise controls real property may use tires in compliance with procedures approved by and rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and procedures approved by each district:

For soil erosion abatement and drainage purposes; or

To secure covers over silage, hay, straw, or agricultural products.

A tire processing facility permit or tire collection center permit, or both, is required for:

A tire retreading business where tires are kept on any real property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the tire retreading business;

A person that in the ordinary course of business removes tires from rims and the tires removed from rims are stored on any real property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the person; or

A tire retailer that is serving as a tire collection center if recyclable tires, waste tires, or used tires culled for resale are kept on any real property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the tire retailer.

If disposed in the state, waste tires originating from a tire manufacturer shall be disposed of at a permitted tire collection center or a permitted tire processing facility for a fee to be established by the permitted tire collection center or permitted tire processing facility.

Records of the disposition of the waste tires originating from a tire manufacturer shall be maintained by that tire manufacturer for a period of at least three (3) years and shall be available for review by the division.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 1993, No. 519, § 1; 1995, No. 1315, § 2; 1997, No. 1292, § 2; 2005, No. 961, § 1; 2005, No. 1951, § 1; 2011, No. 744, § 2; 2015, No. 840, § 2; 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 687, 688; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2865-2869.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As originally enacted by Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1, subsection (c) of this section began:

“on or after July 1, 1992.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “state” for “State of Arkansas” in (b); deleted “Three (3) years after August 12, 2005” at the beginning of (c)(3)(B); and, in (c)(3)(C), deleted “that exceed a rim size of twenty inches (20") and a load rating of ‘E’ or higher” following “tires” and substituted “facility's” for “facilities.”

The 2015 amendment redesignated former (d)(2)(D) as (d)(2)(D)(i); and added (d)(2)(D)(ii).

The 2017 amendment deleted “Within six (6) months after July 15, 1991” at the beginning of the introductory language of (a)(1); in (a)(1)(A), inserted “waste tire” and substituted “number of tires” for “number of waste tires”; in (a)(2), substituted “a written plan approved by the department” for “the approved plan” and “the written plan's” for “its”; rewrote (c); deleted former (d); redesignated former (e) as (d); rewrote present (d); deleted former (f); redesignated former (g)(1) and (g)(2) as (e)(1) and (e)(2); rewrote present (e)(1); inserted “tire” preceding the second occurrence of “manufacturer” in present (e)(2); and deleted former (h).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (c)(3)(A) and (c)(3)(B); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-9-404. Rim removal fees — Import fees — Commercial generator fees — Definitions.

There is imposed a rim removal fee upon the transaction of removing a tire from a rim that is related to the sale of a replacement tire by a tire retailer.

The rim removal fee shall be charged by the tire retailer to a person who:

Purchases a replacement tire for a rim that necessitates the removal of a different tire from the same rim; or

Purchases the service of removal of a tire from a rim and replacement with a tire that was not purchased from the tire retailer if the person requesting the rim removal cannot show proof of payment of the rim removal fee under this section for the replacement tire.

The rim removal fee shall be imposed at the rate of three dollars ($3.00) for each new tire that replaces a tire removed from a rim and one dollar ($1.00) for each used tire that replaces the tire removed from the rim.

Except for the rim removal fees imposed under this section, a tire retailer shall not charge any other fee to a person who purchases the service of removal of a tire from a rim.

For any tires collected by a tire retailer, the tire retailer shall ensure that the tires are transported by a licensed tire transporter to a permitted tire collection center, a solid waste management facility, a tire processing facility, or another tire retailer.

The tire retailer shall account for each tire removed from a rim in the manner prescribed by the Department of Finance and Administration.

Each tire retailer shall register with the department and comply with all requirements related to collecting and reporting rim removal fees.

The rim removal fees imposed under this section shall be added to the total cost charged by the tire retailer to the purchaser after all applicable gross receipts or compensating use taxes on the tires have been computed and shall be separately stated on the invoice or bill of sale.

The rim removal fees imposed under this section shall be paid monthly to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

However, the tire retailer may retain five percent (5%) of the rim removal fee imposed under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section for administrative costs.

The rim removal fees remitted under subdivision (a)(5)(A) of this section shall be collected by the secretary and shall be subject to the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq.

Each tire retailer shall file a return with the secretary on or before the twentieth of each month.

The return shall show the total rim removal fees collected for each tire removed from the rim during the preceding calendar month.

The tire retailer shall remit the rim removal fees with the return.

The secretary shall prescribe the form and contents of the return.

The department shall deposit the proceeds from rim removal fees collected under subsection (a) of this section into the State Treasury as special revenues to the credit of the following funds in the following percentages:

Ninety-three percent (93%) to be deposited into the Used Tire Recycling Fund; and

Seven percent (7%) to be deposited into the Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund.

As used in this section, “proceeds from rim removal fees” means all moneys collected and received by the department under this section for rim removal fees imposed under subsection (a) of this section and interest and penalties on delinquent rim removal fees.

There is imposed an import fee of one dollar ($1.00) on each used tire that is imported into Arkansas.

A person who imports a used tire shall be registered with the department and comply with all requirements related to collecting and reporting import fees.

The import fee imposed under this subsection shall be paid by the person who imports the used tire to the department in accordance with the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq., and any rules promulgated by the department.

The department shall deposit the proceeds from import fees imposed under this subsection into the State Treasury as special revenues to the credit of the following funds in the following percentages:

Ninety-three percent (93%) to be deposited into the Used Tire Recycling Fund; and

Seven percent (7%) to be deposited into the Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund.

As used in this section, “proceeds from import fees” means all moneys collected and received by the department under this subsection and interest and penalties on delinquent import fees.

There is imposed a commercial generator fee upon the transaction of a commercial generator selling or delivering a new tire as part of fleet services.

The commercial generator fee shall be charged by the commercial generator to a person who in the ordinary course of business is an end user that removes used tires from the rim and replaces them with a new tire.

The commercial generator fee shall be imposed at the rate of three dollars ($3.00) for each new tire that is sold or delivered to an end user that removes used tires from the rim and replaces them with a new tire.

Except for the commercial generator fees imposed under this section, the commercial generator shall not charge any other fee to the end user.

For any used tires collected by a commercial generator, the first transportation of the used tire from the end user to the commercial generator's facility does not require a licensed tire transporter.

Any subsequent transportation of the used tire by the commercial generator for recycling or disposal requires a licensed tire transporter and shall be accounted for using the electronic uniform used tire manifest system.

Each commercial generator shall register with the department and comply with all requirements related to collecting and reporting commercial generator fees.

The commercial generator fees imposed under this section shall be added to the total cost charged by the commercial generator to the end user after all applicable gross receipts or compensating use taxes on the tires have been computed and shall be separately stated on the invoice or bill of sale.

The commercial generator fees imposed under this section shall be paid monthly to the secretary.

However, the commercial generator may retain five percent (5%) of the commercial generator fee imposed under subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section for administrative costs.

The commercial generator fees remitted in subdivision (d)(5)(A) of this section shall be collected by the secretary and shall be subject to the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq.

Each commercial generator shall file a return with the secretary on or before the twentieth of each month.

The return shall show the total commercial generator fees collected for each tire sold or delivered to the end user during the preceding calendar month.

The commercial generator shall remit the commercial generator fees with the return.

The secretary shall prescribe the form and contents of the return.

The department shall deposit the proceeds from commercial generator fees collected under this subsection into the State Treasury as special revenues to the credit of the following funds in the following percentages:

Ninety-three percent (93%) to be deposited into the Used Tire Recycling Fund; and

Seven percent (7%) to be deposited into the Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund.

As used in this section, “proceeds from commercial generator fees” means all moneys collected and received by the department under this section for commercial generator fees imposed under this subsection and interest and penalties on delinquent commercial generator fees.

It is the purpose and intent of this section that only one (1) of the following fees imposed under this section be charged for the transaction of removing a tire from a rim that is related to the sale of a replacement tire:

The rim removal fee; or

The commercial generator fee.

If a person establishes that he or she has paid one (1) of the fees for a tire, the tire retailer or tire generator shall not charge an additional fee for that tire.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 1993, No. 1254, §§ 4, 5; 1995, No. 1315, § 3; 1997, No. 1292, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, §§ 113-115; 2003, No. 1304, §§ 2, 3; 2005, No. 1822, § 1; 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 693, §§ 34-38; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2870-2876; 2019, No. 980, §§ 8-10.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Rim removal fees — Import fees — Commercial generator fees” for “Waste tire fees” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “There is” for “Beginning on January 1, 2018, there shall be” in (a)(1) and (d)(1); rewrote (a)(3)(E) and (d)(3)(D) to delete obsolete language; and deleted “Beginning on January 1, 2018” from the beginning of (c)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(5)(A); substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout (a)(6), (d)(5), and (d)(6); and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1)(B), (c)(3)(A)(ii), and (d)(7)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 980 substituted “in the manner prescribed by the Department of Finance and Administration” for “using the electronic uniform used tire manifest system” in (a)(3)(D); in (a)(3)(E), deleted “who was not registered with the Department of Finance and Administration on August 1, 2017” following “retailer” and deleted “on or before December 1, 2017” following “Administration”; deleted “Beginning on January 1, 2018” from the beginning of (c)(1)(A); in (c)(1)(B), inserted “be registered with the Department of Finance and Administration and” and substituted “all requirements related to collecting and reporting import fees” for “the electronic uniform used tire manifest system”; in (d)(3)(D), deleted “who was not registered with the Department of Finance and Administration on August 1, 2017” following “generator” and deleted “on or before December 1, 2017” following “Administration”; and made stylistic changes.

8-9-405. Used tire program reimbursements.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall establish the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Program to:

Reimburse used tire programs for used tire recycling and disposal costs;

Incentivize recycling used tires collected under this subchapter;

Provide accountability for the disbursement of moneys to used tire programs; and

Otherwise improve the sustainability of used tire programs.

To be eligible for reimbursements under this subchapter, a used tire program shall:

Be included in the solid waste management system under § 8-9-101 et seq. for each regional solid waste management district that the used tire program serves;

Have a used tire management plan for each regional solid waste management district that the used tire program serves to include without limitation a schedule for identification and cleanup of waste tire sites that is updated until abatement of each identified waste tire site is completed;

Be included in each regional solid waste management district's recycling program under § 8-9-203 that the used tire program serves;

If operated by a political subdivision of the state or other public entity:

Use the financial management system under § 14-21-101 et seq.;

Comply with the county purchasing procedures under § 14-22-101 et seq.;

Comply with the Arkansas County Accounting Law of 1973, § 14-25-101 et seq.; and

Comply with the Local Fiscal Management Responsibility Act, § 14-77-101 et seq.;

Be operated in compliance with this subchapter and all other laws and rules related to the administration of solid waste management systems and recycling programs in Arkansas;

Encourage the voluntary establishment of tire collection centers at tire retailers, tire processing facilities, and solid waste disposal facilities for the deposit of tires generated in the state;

Provide the division with business plan information required under § 8-9-408;

Provide the division with all quarterly financial information and progress reports related to § 8-9-409;

Establish tire collection centers within each county served by the used tire program that accepts tires from tire retailers at no charge if the tire retailer establishes that it:

Collects the rim removal fee imposed under § 8-9-404(a); and

Complies with the electronic uniform used tire manifest system under § 8-9-407.

The tire collection centers under this subdivision (b)(9) may be at any one (1) or more of the following:

A solid waste disposal facility;

A tire processing facility; or

A tire retailer; and

Establish at least one (1) tire collection center within each county served by the used tire program.

A used tire program that receives reimbursements under this section may:

Contract with a tire processing facility that is approved by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality;

Remove or contract for the removal of tires from waste tire sites within the regional solid waste management district;

Provide incentives for establishing privately operated tire collection centers for the public; and

Form an inter-district used tire program.

Moneys disbursed from the Used Tire Recycling Fund by the division for reimbursements under this section shall be:

Distributed as provided under this section only to the used tire programs that comply with all applicable requirements in this subchapter related to the operation of used tire programs;

Based on moneys available in the fund, the approved business plan rate, quarterly financial reports, and other documentation submitted by the used tire programs; and

Made on a quarterly basis to the used tire programs.

Quarterly disbursements from the fund shall be paid each quarter from all available moneys collected and available for disbursement in that quarter.

If there are insufficient moneys available in a quarter to make reimbursements for all submitted requests under subsection (f) of this section, the division shall calculate the total remaining funding available and allocate the moneys available for reimbursement to each used tire program based on a pro rata share of each used tire program's reimbursement request compared to the total moneys available.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may increase reimbursement rates if the director recommends an increase because of one (1) or more of the following:

The relevant consumer price index for the preceding calendar year exceeded the consumer price index for calendar year 2018; or

The used tire programs have established an increase in operation costs.

An increase to any reimbursement rate under subsection (f) of this section shall not exceed ten percent (10%) each calendar year.

Based on data received from the electronic uniform used tire manifest system and quarterly reports, the funding for reimbursement for processing, recycling, or disposing of used tires at the approved business plan rate may be available from the fund for used tire programs that are in compliance with all applicable requirements of this subchapter.

At the request of a used tire program that needs operational assistance or guidance on compliance with this subchapter, the division shall provide to the used tire program operational assistance or guidance on compliance with this subchapter.

The division shall:

Develop market opportunities for beneficial use of used tire material; and

Educate the public on the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Program.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 1995, No. 1315, § 4; 1997, No. 1292, § 4; 1999, No. 775, § 1; 2003, No. 1304, § 4; 2015, No. 840, § 3; 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 689; 2019, No. 693, § 39; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2877-2883; 2019, No. 980, § 11.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted designations (c)(3)(A) through (c)(3)(C); substituted “submitted” for “approved” in (c)(3)(A); deleted “and expenses expected on waste tire projects during the next quarter and any other information as determined by the department” at the end of (c)(3)(B); and deleted “Accordingly, and upon department approval” at the beginning of (c)(3)(C).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Used tire program reimbursements” for “Waste tire grants” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “laws” in (b)(5).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 deleted “By January 1, 2018” from the beginning of the introductory language of (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “The Division of Environmental Quality” for “By January 1, 2018, the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 980, in (d)(2), deleted “funding levels under subsection (c) of this section” following “fund” and deleted “funding priorities under subsection (f) of this section” following “rate”; rewrote (e)(1); in (e)(2), deleted “any funding level under” preceding “subsection (f)”, deleted “for the funding level” following the first occurrence of “available”, and deleted “for that funding level” following the second occurrence of “available”; and rewrote (f).

8-9-406. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning statewide disposal facilities for waste tires, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1315, § 7. The section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 1993, No. 518, § 2.

8-9-407. Electronic uniform used tire manifest system.

The following entities shall use the electronic uniform used tire manifest system to accurately report all information related to the collection, transportation, distribution, and recycling or disposal of recyclable tires, waste tires, and used tires culled for resale:

Used tire programs;

Tire generators;

Tire collection centers;

Any person who:

Removes a tire from the used tire program after it is collected; or

Imports a tire under § 8-9-404(c); and

Commercial generators.

If any of the persons or entities listed in subsection (a) of this section cannot use the electronic uniform used tire manifest system, the person or entity may submit to the used tire program an equivalent paper version which shall be entered into the electronic uniform used tire manifest system.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 693, § 40.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “Beginning on January 1, 2018” from the beginning of (a).

8-9-408. Accountability requirements for used tire programs — Business plans.

On or before December 31, 2017, a used tire program that receives funding under this subchapter shall provide the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality, now the Division of Environmental Quality, with a business plan that establishes its current operating plan and a proposed operating plan for calendar year 2018 and approved by its board.

The minimum required information for the business plan is:

Current operation information to include:

An explanation of debt and debt repayment obligations, including scheduled payments;

A description of equipment used, including type, year manufactured, debt obligations related to the equipment, and whether it is leased or owned;

An explanation of contract obligations including the amount, length, and scope of the contract;

A description of how tires are managed, to include without limitation collection, transportation, and disposal or recycling;

An explanation of costs, including the cost of tire collection centers, other collection facilities, trailers, transfer stations, processing, mileage, fuel, and personnel; and

The number of tires currently on any property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by each regional solid waste management district included in the used tire program; and

Proposed operation costs for calendar year 2018, to include:

A description of how tires will be managed, to include without limitation collection, storage, transportation, and disposal or recycling;

Estimated cost of utilities, personnel, equipment, fees, leases, facilities, and any other costs related to the primary operation of the used tire program;

The capital improvement and maintenance plan with estimated expenditures and costs;

The estimated transportation cost including mileage, fuel, equipment, personnel, utilities, insurance, bonds, and fees;

The locations of all tire collection centers; and

The types of tires managed, to include recyclable tires, waste tires, and used tires culled for resale.

A used tire program shall submit a revised business plan if there is a substantial change in the used tire program operations or if the division requests a revised business plan.

A business plan or revised business plan submitted under this subchapter is effective after approval by the division or its designee.

The approved business plan or approved revised business plan shall include the approved business plan rates for each used tire program.

The division shall cooperate with the used tire programs and other entities to develop each used tire program's approved business plan rates for recyclable tires and waste tires.

The approved business plan rates shall also use the size of a tire, including without limitation small tires, large tires, and extra-large tires, as a factor for determining the approved business plan rates.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2884, 2885.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “now the Division of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c), (d), and (e)(2)(A).

8-9-409. Performance and efficiency evaluations.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall develop a system to evaluate and report the performance and efficiency of used tire programs and the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Program.

The evaluation and reporting system shall use the following performance indicators for each used tire program:

The number of:

Recyclable tires;

Waste tires disposed in a landfill; and

Waste tires disposed in a monofill;

The number of reported waste tire sites located in the regional solid waste management districts that are included in the used tire program;

Electronic uniform used tire manifest system compliance;

Administrative expenses;

Transportation expenses;

Building, warehouse, and other facilities expenses;

Revenue sources and the amount of revenue received from each source;

The number, location, and type of tire collection centers;

Any identified operational issues;

The number of enforcement actions against the used tire program; and

Any other performance indicators that are determined to be useful to evaluate performance and efficiency.

The evaluations under this section shall be completed on a biennial basis for each used tire program.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 693, § 41; 2019, No. 910, § 2886.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 deleted “with the first evaluations to be completed on or before December 31, 2018” from the end of (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

8-9-410. Consolidation of used tire programs.

The General Assembly finds:

The smaller the population and geographical area that a used tire program serves, the more unsustainable the used tire program is;

In contrast, it has been noted nationally and within the state that used tire programs that serve a larger population and greater geographical area collect and process a large number of tires, are sustainable, and optimize the use of economies of scale;

Before January 1, 2017, there were eleven (11) waste tire districts in the state; and

It is in the best interest of the state for the used tire programs to combine to form inter-district used tire programs to operate in an efficient and financially sustainable manner.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 980, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Consolidation of used” for “Incentives to consolidate used” in the section heading; deleted the (a) designation; and deleted (b).

8-9-411. Tire transporters — Licenses.

A tire transporter shall meet the following requirements to perform or be compensated for any duties under this subchapter related to the administration and operation of a used tire program:

Obtain for each vehicle a license;

Obtain for each vehicle a tire transporter number provided by the Division of Environmental Quality used for the electronic uniform used tire manifest system;

Provide proof that each vehicle has passed an annual safety inspection;

Provide proof of financial responsibility for each vehicle and authorized driver;

Provide a bond in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

Establish that each authorized driver has completed training for the electronic uniform used tire manifest system; and

Pay a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each vehicle that is licensed.

For each tire transporter licensed under this section, the division shall assign a tire transporter number and include the tire transporter information in the electronic uniform used tire manifest system.

If a tire transporter is found to have not complied with this subchapter, the tire transporter's license shall be suspended for three (3) months.

If the license of a tire transporter is suspended more than one (1) time in three (3) years, the tire transporter's license shall be revoked and the tire transporter is ineligible for a tire transporter license for three (3) years.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 693, § 42; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2887, 2888.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 deleted “For all tire transporters licensed on or after January 1, 2018” from the beginning of (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(2); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

8-9-412. Additional fees.

A used tire program may charge an additional fee for the collection and recycling of extra-large tires from sources other than registered tire retailers and for any tires in excess of the maximum under § 8-9-414(b)(7).

If a used tire program charges an additional fee under this section, the fee shall be collected and retained by the used tire program for costs related to the processing of extra-large tires.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 317, § 1.

8-9-413. Applicability.

The fees imposed by this subchapter shall not apply to:

Large retreaded tires;

Tires included as part of the equipment of a new vehicle; or

Tires included as part of the equipment of a used vehicle if included on the used vehicle at the time of sale and in the sales price of the used vehicle.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 317, § 1.

8-9-414. Powers and duties of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall promulgate rules to carry out the intent and purposes of this subchapter.

The rules shall:

Except as provided under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section, provide for the administration of permits for tire processing facilities, tire collection centers, commercial generators, and any other person or entity that collects, receives, processes, recycles, or disposes of used tires regulated under this subchapter with the maximum permit fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) annually.

The maximum permit fee under this subdivision (b)(1) shall not apply to tire transporters;

Establish standards for tire processing facilities, tire collection centers, tire transporters, and beneficial use projects;

Establish procedures for administering reimbursements to used tire programs under § 8-9-405;

Unless otherwise provided by law, authorize the final disposition of waste tires at a permitted solid waste disposal facility if the waste tires have been cut into sufficiently small parts for proper disposal and in compliance with this subchapter and all other applicable provisions in this title;

Establish procedures for administering the electronic uniform used tire manifest system;

Establish accountability procedures for the sustainability of used tire programs operated under this subchapter; and

Establish the number of tires that each individual who is a resident of a regional solid waste management district may discard monthly without a fee.

The maximum number of tires under this subdivision (b)(7) shall not be more than four (4) tires per month.

The commission may:

Develop an alternative tire transporter licensing program to be administered by used tire programs, regional solid waste management boards, or both;

Promulgate rules that are necessary to administer the fees and reimbursement rates for services provided under this subchapter by the used tire programs; and

Clarify and add definitions for sizes of tires using technical information and specifications.

The commission shall encourage the establishment of voluntary tire collection centers where used tires generated in Arkansas can be deposited.

The voluntary tire collection centers shall include without limitation tire retailers, tire processing facilities, and solid waste disposal facilities.

The voluntary tire collection centers shall not include the collection of tires generated by a tire manufacturer.

The commission shall not prohibit the disposal of waste tires in landfills or monofills for three (3) years from August 1, 2017.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 690, 691.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a), the introductory language of (b), and in (c)(2).

8-9-415. Permitting, licensing, inspections, procedures, enforcement, and penalties.

A person who receives funding under this subchapter, tire collection centers, tire retailers, tire processing facilities, tire transporters, tire generators, commercial generators, used tires regulated under this subchapter, and waste tire sites are subject to:

All provisions in § 8-1-101 et seq., § 8-1-201 et seq., § 8-1-301 et seq., § 8-4-101 et seq., and § 8-4-201 et seq., concerning permits, licensing, inspections, and procedures;

Sections 8-6-204 and 8-6-205, 8-6-207(a)(6), and 8-9-105 concerning penalties and enforcement; and

All applicable rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

A used tire program is subject to penalties and enforcement under this subchapter for noncompliance with this subchapter to include without limitation:

Failure to use the electronic uniform used tire manifest system;

Failure to submit accurate information to the electronic uniform used tire manifest system;

Failure to submit an approved business plan on or before July 1, 2018;

Failure to submit a revised business plan as required under § 8-9-408(c);

Failure to submit an approved revised business plan within three (3) months after submission; or

Failure to provide documentation or reports required to be filed with the Division of Environmental Quality under this subchapter.

If a used tire program fails to submit a business plan that is approved by the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the division on or before July 1, 2018, the used tire program and all regional solid waste management boards included in the used tire program on July 1, 2018, are:

Ineligible to receive funding under this subchapter and from the Used Tire Recycling Fund;

Prohibited from administering and operating a used tire program; and

Prohibited from imposing any fees to support the administration and operation of a used tire program.

The division may designate a qualified entity to perform the duties related to the operation and administration of a used tire program deemed ineligible under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

A qualified entity that is designated to perform the duties related to the operation and administration of a used tire program under this subsection shall operate the used tire program in compliance with this subchapter.

If the qualified entity performs the duties related to the operation and administration of the used tire program in compliance with this subchapter, the qualified entity is eligible to receive funding under this subchapter and from the fund.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a tire processing facility permit or a tire collection center permit shall be suspended or revoked for noncompliance with this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 692; 2019, No. 910, §§
2889-2891.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(6); substituted “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” in the introductory language of (c)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c)(2)(A).

Subchapter 5
— Arkansas Newspaper Recycling Advisory Committee

8-9-501 — 8-9-506. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2892, amended § 8-9-502 to
replace “Arkansas Department” with “Division” before “of Environmental Quality”. However, Acts 2019, No 976, § 1, specifically repealed § 8-9-502.

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the Arkansas Newspaper Recycling Advisory Committee, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 976, § 1, effective July 24, 2019. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

8-9-501. Acts 1993, No. 991, § 1; 2017, No. 1067, § 6.

8-9-502. Acts 1993, No. 991, § 2; 1995, No. 658, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 116; 2019, No. 910, § 2892.

8-9-503. Acts 1993, No. 991, § 3.

8-9-504. Acts 1993, No. 991, § 4.

8-9-505. Acts 1993, No. 991, § 5.

8-9-506. Acts 1993, No. 991, § 6; 2017, No. 1067, § 7.